Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.415

Development of methods and protocols for measuring educational costs—Reports.

(1) The education data center, in consultation with the house of representatives and senate committees responsible for higher education, the respective fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate, the office of financial management, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the state institutions of higher education, shall develop standardized methods and protocols for measuring the undergraduate and graduate educational costs for the state universities, regional universities, and community colleges, including but not limited to the costs of instruction, costs to provide degrees in specific fields, and costs for precollege remediation.

(2) The institutions of higher education shall participate in the development of cost study methods and shall provide all necessary data in a timely fashion consistent with the protocols developed.

(3) Beginning December 1, 2012, and each December 1st thereafter, the center must provide cost study reports intended to meet the information needs of the governor's office and the legislature and the requirements of RCW 43.41.410.

[ 2012 c 229 s 303; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 105; 2004 c 275 s 15; 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 7; 1992 c 231 s 5; 1989 c 245 s 3. Prior: 1985 c 390 s 16; 1985 c 370 s 65; 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 16; 1981 c 257 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 322 s 7. Formerly RCW 28B.76.310, 28B.15.070.]

NOTES:

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Intent—Purpose—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 37: See notes following RCW 28B.15.012.

Severability—1981 c 257: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 322: See note following RCW 28B.15.065.